Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-143
Order; appeal; effect; attorney's fees.

The commission and any person interested in the court's decision may appeal to the Court of Appeals under the rules provided by law as to security for an appeal to the Court of Appeals, except that in no case shall security for an appeal be required when the appeal is taken by the commission. An appeal to the Court of Appeals shall not operate to stay or supersede the order of the court or the issuance of execution thereon, and the court may in every such matter order the payment of such costs and attorney's fees as it deems reasonable.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. I, § 43, p. 1370;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 136;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 56.